apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="pokład__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owi</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōw</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ami</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rozkł/ŏd__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ŏd</l>        <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adu</l>       <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adowi</l>     <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŏd</l>        <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adym</l>      <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adzie</l>     <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adzie</l>     <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ady</l>       <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adōw</l>      <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adōm</l>      <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ady</l>       <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adami</l>     <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adach</l>     <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ady</l>       <r>ŏd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Czad__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owi</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōw</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ami</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="zach/ōd__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ōd</l>        <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odu</l>       <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odowi</l>     <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōd</l>        <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odym</l>      <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odzie</l>     <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odzie</l>     <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ody</l>       <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odōw</l>      <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odōm</l>      <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ody</l>       <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odami</l>     <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odach</l>     <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ody</l>       <r>ōd<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pł/eć__n">
  <e>       <p><l>eć</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eć</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciōm</l>      <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cie</l>       <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciōm</l>      <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciami</l>     <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ciach</l>     <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>eć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="abszid">          <i>abszid</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="absztand">        <i>absztand</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="akord">           <i>akord</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="biksyngeld">      <i>biksyngeld</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="blatgold">        <i>blatgold</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="brand">           <i>brand</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="brzōd">           <i>brzōd</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="chłōd">           <i>chł</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="chłōńd">          <i>chłōńd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="dochōd">          <i>doch</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="dyndelklajd">     <i>dyndelklajd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="ferband">         <i>ferband</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="glid">            <i>glid</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="grōd">            <i>gr</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="głōd">            <i>gł</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="halsband">        <i>halsband</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="holzband">        <i>holzband</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="izolyrband">      <i>izolyrband</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="jōd">             <i>j</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="jŏd">             <i>j</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="ukłŏd">           <i>ukł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="klajd">           <i>klajd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="lōd">             <i>l</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="land">            <i>land</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="majland">         <i>majland</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="miōd">            <i>mi</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="nakłŏd">          <i>nakł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="nŏrōd">           <i>nŏr</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="pad">             <i>pad</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="pokład">          <i>pokład</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="pokłŏd">          <i>pokł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="popynd">          <i>popynd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="porōd">           <i>por</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="powōd">           <i>pow</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="przechōd">        <i>przechōd</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="przekłŏd">        <i>przekł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="przewōd">         <i>przew</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="przichōd">        <i>przich</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="przikłŏd">        <i>przikł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="płeć">            <i>pł</i><par n="pł/eć__n"/></e>
<e lm="rōd">             <i>r</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="rod">             <i>rod</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="rozkłŏd">         <i>rozkł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="rutherford">      <i>rutherford</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="schōd">           <i>schōd</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="skłŏd">           <i>skł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="smynd">           <i>smynd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="spynd">           <i>spynd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="szpind">          <i>szpind</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="sztandard">       <i>sztandard</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="słōd">            <i>sł</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="taszyngeld">      <i>taszyngeld</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="trinkgeld">       <i>trinkgeld</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="uchōd">           <i>uch</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="upad">            <i>upad</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="wchōd">           <i>wch</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="wchōd">           <i>wchōd</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="weschōd">         <i>wesch</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="wikynd">          <i>wikynd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="wodopŏd">         <i>wodop</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="wyglōnd">         <i>wyglōnd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="wykłŏd">          <i>wykł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="wywōd">           <i>wywōd</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="zŏchōd">          <i>zŏch</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="zawōd">           <i>zaw</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="ôbchōd">          <i>ôbchōd</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="żołōnd">          <i>żołōnd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="Czad">            <i>Czad</i><par n="Czad__np"/></e>
<e lm="poglōnd">         <i>poglōnd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="bilard">          <i>bilard</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="przechōd">        <i>przech</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="pochōd">          <i>poch</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="schōd">           <i>sch</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="smrōd">           <i>smr</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="przōd">           <i>prz</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
<e lm="podkłŏd">         <i>podkł</i><par n="rozkł/ŏd__n"/></e>
<e lm="wanad">           <i>wanad</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="rozpad">          <i>rozpad</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="zad">             <i>zad</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="ôsōnd">           <i>ôsōnd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="napynd">          <i>napynd</i><par n="pokład__n"/></e>
<e lm="płōd">            <i>pł</i><par n="zach/ōd__n"/></e>
